Nebraska, session 109, LB959.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB959 LB959
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1908 (1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.
(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need
for quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to
establish and maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to
ensure that such persons are competent and are using safe and adequate
facilities. The Legislature further finds and declares that the
development and supervision of programs are a matter of statewide concern
and should be dealt with uniformly on the state and local levels. There
is a need for cooperation among the various state and local agencies
which impose standards on licensees, and there should be one agency which
coordinates the enforcement of such standards and informs the Legislature
about cooperation among the various agencies.
Sec. 2. (1) The department shall establish a youth afterschool
credential for individuals who are sixteen or seventeen years of age and
who are seeking employment in school-age child care programs or temporary
nonresidential child care programs. For purposes of this section
temporary nonresidential child care program means child care provided (a)
for no more than twelve consecutive hours, (b) not on a continuous or
regularly scheduled basis, and (c) in a location not ordinarily used as a
licensed child care center.
(2) To obtain a youth afterschool credential, an applicant shall:
(a) Complete all registry checks required for licensed child care
staff, including the child abuse and neglect and sex offender registries,
and any additional registry checks required by the department;
(b) Submit all background check documentation required by the
department; and
(c) Complete a minimum seven-hour new staff orientation for school-
age programs approved by the department.
-2-

LB959 LB959
2026 2026
(3) A youth applicant who has submitted all required background
check materials may engage in provisional employment while such checks
are pending if: (a) The individual is not left alone in a room with
children; (b) the individual is not included in staff-to-child ratio
requirements; and (c) the individual's provisional employment is limited
to school-age child care programs and temporary nonresidential child care
programs.
(4) Upon completion of the requirements in subsection (2) of this
section, the department shall issue a youth afterschool credential. The
credential shall be valid for one year after the date of issuance and may
be renewed through an expedited process established by the department.
(5) A licensed child care program or youth-serving program approved
by the department may accept a valid youth afterschool credential as
verification that the holder has met the initial background check and
training requirements under this section.
(6) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section, including, but not limited to, application
procedures, background check verification, renewal procedures, fees,
approval of training providers, and privacy and data-sharing protections.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall establish an adult eligibility
passport to verify program-ready status for individuals eighteen years of
age or older and to provide portability of background check requirements
between licensed child care programs and approved youth-serving programs.
For purposes of this section, program-ready status means verification
that an individual has completed all background check and training
requirements established by the department and is eligible for employment
under this section.
(2) An adult applicant may apply for an adult eligibility passport
by submitting all documentation required by the department, including:
(a) A full criminal history record information check, including
fingerprinting; (b) a check of the child abuse and neglect and sex
-3-

LB959 LB959
2026 2026
offender registries; and (c) other background check or documentation
required by the department for licensure purposes.
(3)(a) An adult eligibility passport shall be valid for one year
after the date of issuance and shall serve as proof that the holder has
satisfied all state-mandated initial background check requirements for
employment under this section.
(b) Licensed child care programs and approved youth-serving programs
shall accept a current and valid adult eligibility passport as
verification that an individual has met the initial background check
requirements required by this section.
(4) The adult eligibility passport shall be renewable annually
through an expedited process established by the department. The
department shall automatically update the passport record if new
background check information becomes available.
(5) The department may impose an application or renewal fee for the
adult eligibility passport, which shall not exceed the cost of
administering background checks, documentation, and issuance of the
passport.
(6) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section, including, but not limited to, application
procedures, background check verification, renewal procedures, fees,
approval of training providers, and privacy and data-sharing protections.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-4-